Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB529.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5450XD (2) 91 as/js S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 709.16, subsections 1 and 3, Code 2026, 1 are amended to read as follows: 2 1. Any peace officer, or an officer, employee, contractor, 3 vendor, volunteer, or agent of the department of corrections, 4 or an officer, employee, or agent of a judicial district 5 department of correctional services, who engages in a sex 6 act with an individual committed to the custody of the 7 department of corrections or a judicial district department of 8 correctional services commits an aggravated misdemeanor a class 9 âDâ felony . 10 3. Any peace officer, or an officer, employee, contractor, 11 vendor, volunteer, or agent of a county who engages in a sex 12 act with a prisoner incarcerated in a county jail commits an 13 aggravated misdemeanor a class âDâ felony . 14 Sec. 2. Section 709.16, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 15 2026, is amended to read as follows: 16 a. Any peace officer, or an officer, employee, contractor, 17 vendor, volunteer, or agent of a juvenile placement facility 18 who engages in a sex act with a juvenile placed at such 19 facility commits an aggravated misdemeanor a class âDâ felony . 20